Utah statutes.
36-20-5.   Committee review -- Fiscal analyst -- Powers of committee.
(1)  To carry out its duties, the committee may examine any other issues that
it considers necessary.
(2)  The committee may request the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst to
prepare a fiscal note on any court rule or proposal for court rule.
(3)  In order to accomplish its functions, the committee has all the powers
granted to legislative interim committees as set forth in Section 36-12-11.
